Maryland, session 2026, SB0191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–319 and 7–320 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–320 and 7–321, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–319.
(A) THE SONG “THE HEART OF MARYLAND”, WRITTEN BY JAYLA ELISE
FROM DORCHESTER COUNTY FOR THE MARYLAND 250 PROJECT, IS THE STATE
SONG.
(B) THE WORDS OF THE STATE SONG ARE:
I
TOGETHER WE STAND,
IN THE HEART OF THIS LAND.
THROUGH STEEL AND STONE,

SENATE BILL 191 3
WE’VE CALLED THIS PLACE HOME.
II
THROUGH THE CANNON ROAR AND THE BATTLE CRIES,
MARYLAND WAVED AGAINST THE SKIES.
FROM THE HARBOR’S TIDE TO THE MOUNTAIN STREAMS,
WE’VE BUILT A HOME,
TO CHASE OUR DREAMS.
III
WE ARE MARYLAND, BOLD AND FREE,
BORN OF FIRE, SHAPED BY EVERY SINGLE TRIAL,
EVERY STORM,
WE STAND TALL, AND WE ARE STRONG.
IV
OH, WATCH THE BRIDGES RISE AND
CARVE THE HANDS OF TIME.
OH, PLACES ON THE SHORE,
LEAVES YOU WANTING MORE.
V
TOGETHER WE STAND,
IN THE HEART OF THIS LAND.
THROUGH STEEL AND STONE,
WE’VE CALLED THIS PLACE HOME.
VI
WHERE THE HISTORY LIVES, AND THE FAMILIES THRIVE,
MARYLAND’S SPIRIT STAYS ALIVE.
WE’VE WEATHERED TIME, WE’VE STOOD AS ONE,
CREATING HOPE WITH EVERY SUN.
VII
WITH UNITY WE FIND OUR SONG,
RIGHT HERE, WHERE WE ALL BELONG.
YOU’LL FREE YOUR SOUL, YOU’LL FREE YOUR MIND,
HERE IN MARYLAND,
LEAVE NO ONE BEHIND.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.